District of Columbia statutes.
38-921

Teachers of aeronautics.

The Board is further authorized to employ a sufficient number of teachers of aeronautics, not to exceed 6, adequately to instruct those pupils who elect to pursue the said course, at the salary rates authorized for teachers in the senior high schools.

Dec. 16, 1941, 55 Stat. 807, ch. 585, § 2
1981 Ed., § 31-902.
1973 Ed., § 31-1202.